test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_soddad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - šoddâđ: # 
    šoddâđ+V+Inf: šoddâđ
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: šoodâm
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: šoodah
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šadda
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: šaddeen
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: šoddâvettee
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: šoddâv
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: šoddâp
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: šoddâvetteđ
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: šaddeh
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: šoddim
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: šoddih
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: šoodâi
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: šoodáim
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: šoodáid
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: šoodáin
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: šoodâim
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: šoodâid
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: šoddii
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: šodâččim
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: šodâččih
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: šodâččij
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Du1: šodâččáim
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Du2: šodâččáid
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Du3: šodâččáin
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: šodâččijm
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: šodâččijd
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: šodâččii
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: šaddeem
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: šaddeeh
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: šoodâš
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Du1: šodâžeen
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Du2: šoodâšvettee
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Du3: šodâžává
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: šodâžep
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: šoodâšvetteđ
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: šodâžeh
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: šoodâ
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: šados
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: šaddoon
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: šaddee
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: šaddoos
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: šaddop
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: šoddâđ
    šoddâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: šaddoos
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: šoodâ
    šoddâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: šoddâm
    šoddâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: šodâččii
    šoddâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: šoddii
    šoddâđ+V+PrsPrc: šaddee
    šoddâđ+V+PrfPrc: šoddâm
    šoddâđ+V+Actio: šoddâm
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Ess: šoddâmin
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Loc: šoddâmist
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Ill: šoddâmân
    šoddâđ+V+Actio+Com: šodâdijn
    šoddâđ+V+VAbess: šodâhánnáá


  Verb - ettâđ: # 
    ettâđ+V+Inf: ettâđ
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eeđâm
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: eeđah
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iätá
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: etteen
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: etâvettee
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: ettâv
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ettâp
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: etâvetteđ
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: eteh
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ettim
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ettih
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: eeđâi
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: eeđáim
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: eeđáid
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: eeđáin
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: eeđâim
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: eeđâid
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ettii
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: eđâččim
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: eđâččih
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: eđâččij
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Du1: eđâččáim
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Du2: eđâččáid
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Du3: eđâččáin
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: eđâččijm
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: eđâččijd
    ettâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: eđâččii
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: eeđeem
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: eeđeeh
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: eeđâš
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Du1: eđâžeen
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Du2: eeđâšvettee
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Du3: eđâžává
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: eđâžep
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: eeđâšvetteđ
    ettâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: eđâžeh
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: eeđâ
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: iäđus
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: iättoon
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: ettee
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: iättus
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: iättup
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ettâđ
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: iättus
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: eeđâ
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: ettâm
    ettâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: eđâččii
    ettâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: eeđii
    ettâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: eeđâ
    ettâđ+V+PrsPrc: ettee
    ettâđ+V+PrfPrc: ettâm
    ettâđ+V+Actio: ettâm
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Ess: etâmin
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Loc: etâmist
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Ill: etâmân
    ettâđ+V+Actio+Com: eđâdijn
    ettâđ+V+VAbess: eđâhánnáá



  Verb - kalgâđ: #
    kalgâđ+V+Inf: kalgâđ
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kaalgah
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kálgá
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kälgeen
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kalgâvettee
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kalgâv
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kalgâp
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kalgâvetteđ
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kälgih
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kalgim
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kalgih
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaalgâi
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kalgáim
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kalgáid
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kalgáin
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaalgâim
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaalgâid
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kalgii
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kalgâččim
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kalgâččih
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kalgâččij
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Du1: kalgâččáim
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Du2: kalgâččáid
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Du3: kalgâččáin
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kalgâččijm
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kalgâččijd
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kalgâččii
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kälgeem
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kälgeeh
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kaalgâš
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Du1: kalgâžeen
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Du2: kaalgâšvettee
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Du3: kalgâžává
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kalgâžep
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kaalgâšvetteđ
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kalgâžeh
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kaalgâ
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: káálgus
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kálgoon
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kälgee
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kálgus
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kálgup
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kalgâđ
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kálgus
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kaalgâ
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kalgâččii
    kalgâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kalgii
    kalgâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kaalgâ
    kalgâđ+V+PrsPrc: kälgee
    kalgâđ+V+PrfPrc: kalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Actio: kalgâm
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kalgâmin
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kalgâmist
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kalgâmân
    kalgâđ+V+Actio+Com: kalgâdijn
    kalgâđ+V+VAbess: kalgâhánnáá



  Verb - kolgâđ: #
    kolgâđ+V+Inf: kolgâđ
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: koolgah
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalga
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kalgeen
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kolgâvettee
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kolgâv
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kolgâp
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kolgâvetteđ
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kalgeh
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kolgim
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kolgih
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: koolgâi
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kolgáim
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kolgáid
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kolgáin
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: koolgâim
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: koolgâid
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kolgii
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kolgâččim
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kolgâččih
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kolgâččij
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Du1: kolgâččáim
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Du2: kolgâččáid
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Du3: kolgâččáin
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kalgâččijm
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kalgâččijd
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kalgâččii
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kalgeem
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kalgeeh
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: koolgâš
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Du1: kolgâžeen
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Du2: koolgâšvettee
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Du3: kolgâžává
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kolgâžep
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: koolgâšvetteđ
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kolgâžeh
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: koolgâ
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kolgâččii
    kolgâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kolgii
    kolgâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: koolgâ
    kolgâđ+V+PrfPrc: kolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Actio: kolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kolgâmin
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kolgâmist
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kolgâmân
    kolgâđ+V+Actio+Com: kolgâdijn
    kolgâđ+V+VAbess: kolgâhánnáá


  Verb - kulgâđ: #
    kulgâđ+V+Inf: kulgâđ
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuulgah
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgá
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kolgeen
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kulgâvettee
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kulgâv
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kulgâp
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kulgâvetteđ
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kolgeh
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kulgim
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kulgih
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kuulgâi
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kulgáim
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kulgáid
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kulgáin
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kuulgâim
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kuulgâid
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kulgii
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kulgâččim
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kulgâččih
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kulgâččij
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Du1: kulgâččáim
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Du2: kulgâččáid
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Du3: kulgâččáin
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kulgâččijm
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kulgâččijd
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kulgâččii
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kolgeem
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kolgeeh
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kuulgâš
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Du1: kulgâžeen
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Du2: kuulgâšvettee
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Du3: kulgâžává
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kulgâžep
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kuulgâšvetteđ
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kulgâžeh
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kuulgâ
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kolgos
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kolgoon
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kolgee
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kolgoos
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kolgop
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kulgâđ
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kolgoos
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kuulgâ
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kulgâččii
    kulgâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: kulgii
    kulgâđ+V+Imprt+ConNeg: kuulgâ
    kulgâđ+V+PrsPrc: kolgee
    kulgâđ+V+PrfPrc: kulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Actio: kulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kulgâmin
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kulgâmist
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kulgâmân
    kulgâđ+V+Actio+Com: kulgâdijn
    kulgâđ+V+VAbess: kulgâhánnáá















  Verb - viggâđ: #
    viggâđ+V+Inf: viggâđ
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viigâm
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viigah
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viggá
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viggeen
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: viggâvettee
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viggâv
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viggâp
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viggâvetteđ
    viggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viggeh
